test/src/morphology/N-my_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - мӱ: # Noun 'honey' 
     мӱ+N+Sg+Nom: мӱ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Gen: мӱн
     мӱ+N+Sg+Acc: мӱм
     мӱ+N+Sg+Com: мӱге
     мӱ+N+Sg+Dat: мӱлӓн
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ine: мӱштӹ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ill: мӱшкӹ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Lat: мӱэш
     мӱ+N+Sg+Comp: мӱлӓ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Abe: мӱде
     мӱ+N+Pl+Nom: мӱвлӓ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Gen: мӱвлӓн
     мӱ+N+Pl+Acc: мӱвлӓм
     мӱ+N+Pl+Com: мӱвлӓге
     мӱ+N+Pl+Dat: мӱвлӓлӓн
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ine: мӱвлӓштӹ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ill: [мӱвлӓшкӹ, мӱвлӓш]
     мӱ+N+Pl+Lat: мӱвлӓэш
     мӱ+N+Pl+Comp: мӱвлӓлӓ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Abe: мӱвлӓде

#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: мӱэм
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: мӱэм
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: мӱэмӹн
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: мӱэмӹм
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: мӱэмге
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: мӱэмлӓн
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: мӱштем
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: мӱшкем
     мӱ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: мӱэшем
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: [мӱлӓэм, мӱэмлӓ] 
     мӱ+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: мӱлӓэм # teoreett tai toissijais.versio_jk
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: мӱэмлӓ 
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: [мӱдеэм, мӱэмде] 
     мӱ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: мӱдеэм # teoreett tai toissijais.versio_jk
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: мӱэмде 
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: [мӱвлӓэм, мӱэмвлӓ] # х3
     мӱ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мӱвлӓэм 
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: мӱэмвлӓ
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: мӱэмвлӓн
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: мӱэмвлӓм
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: [мӱвлӓэмге, мӱэмвлӓге]
     мӱ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: мӱвлӓэмге
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: мӱэмвлӓге # käytäisin toisen var: N+Pl+PxSg1+Com мӱвлӓэмге
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: [мӱвлӓэмлӓн, мӱвлӓлӓнем, мӱэмвлӓлӓн]
     мӱ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: мӱвлӓэмлӓн
     мӱ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мӱвлӓлӓнем
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: мӱэмвлӓлӓн # käytä toinen var: мӱвлӓлӓнем
# Is this usage or morphology?
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: [мӱвлӓштем, мӱэмвлӓштӹ] 
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: [мӱвлӓшкем, мӱэмвлӓшкӹ]
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: мӱвлӓштем
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: мӱвлӓшкем
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: [мӱвлӓэшем, мӱэмвлӓэш]
     мӱ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: мӱвлӓэшем  
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: мӱэмвлӓэш # käytä toinen var: мӱвлӓэшем
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: [мӱвлӓэмлӓ, мӱвлӓлӓэм, мӱэмвлӓлӓ]
     мӱ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: мӱвлӓэмлӓ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: мӱвлӓлӓэм
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: мӱэмвлӓлӓ # käytä toinen var: мӱвлӓлӓэм
#     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: [мӱвлӓэмде, мӱэмвлӓде]
     мӱ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: мӱвлӓэмде
     мӱ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: мӱэмвлӓде
#мӱэт, мӱэтшӹ, 
#мӱжы, 
